Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-149
Domestic companies; right to do business in other states; reciprocity.

If any domestic insurance company or association, or domestic fraternal benefit society, having a certificate of authority from the Department of Insurance, shall make application for admission to any other state or country, and shall comply with all the statutory regulations of such state or country, and it shall be refused admission to such state or country, the director may revoke every certificate of authority granted to like companies or societies organized under the laws of the state or country so refusing admission to a domestic insurance company or association or domestic fraternal benefit society, unless and until such country or state shall grant the necessary license or certificate to such domestic insurance company or association or fraternal benefit society.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 155a, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 3293;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XI, § 21, p. 654;

C.S.1922, § 7900;

C.S.1929, § 44-1121;

R.S.1943, § 44-149;

Laws 1971, LB 792, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 17, § 1.